New York, session 2025-2026, S9687.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The civil rights law is amended by adding a new section 2 79-r to read as follows: 3 § 79-r. Prohibition on certain databases and registries. No state or 4 local agency, or any agent thereof, may use any funds, facilities, prop- 5 erty, equipment or personnel of such agency to investigate, enforce or 6 provide assistance in the investigation or enforcement of any federal 7 program requiring registration of individuals, or maintaining a database 8 of individuals, on the basis of race, color, creed, gender, sexual 9 orientation, religion, or national or ethnic origin. For the purposes 10 of this section, the term "agency" shall mean any state or municipal 11 department, board, bureau, division, commission, committee, public 12 authority, public corporation, council, office or other governmental 13 entity performing a governmental or proprietary function for the state 14 or any one or more municipalities thereof. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03209-01-5